Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 3 Vicious Dogs

4-8-40 through 4-8-45.
[Repealed]

History.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 472, § 1/HB 1497; Ga. L. 2008, p. 114, § 2-1/HB 301; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 5/HB 685, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 6/HB 685, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the repeal of this article shall apply to proceedings for the classification and registration of dogs which are pending on July 1, 2012, as well as to such proceedings which arise on or after July 1, 2012.